California, session 20252026, AB2623.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 491 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:491. Unless the commission otherwise orders, no a change shall not be made by any a public utility in any a rate or classification, or in any a rule or contract relating to to, or affecting any affecting, a rate, classification, or service, or in any a privilege or facility, except after 30 60 days’ notice to the commission and to the public. Notice shall be given by filing with the commission and keeping open for public inspection new schedules stating plainly the changes to be made in the schedule or schedules then in force, and the time when the changes will go into effect. The commission, for good cause shown, may allow changes without requiring the 30 60 days’ notice, by an order specifying the changes that may be made on less than 30 60 days’ notice, the time when they the changes shall take effect, and the manner in which they the changes shall be filed and published. When any If a change is proposed in any a rate or classification, or in any a form of contract or agreement or in any a rule or contract relating to or affecting any a rate, classification, or service, or in any a privilege or facility, attention shall be directed to such the change on the schedule filed with the commission, by some character to be designated by the commission, immediately preceding or following the item.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SECTION 1.Section 39600 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:39600.The state board shall do those acts as may be necessary for the proper execution of the powers and duties granted to, and imposed upon, the state board by this division and by any other law.